trunk/apertium-es-pt/apertium-es-pt.es.dix
    <pardef n="compr/imir__vblex">
    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>esa</l> 
        <r>imir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>esas</l> 
        <r>imir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>eso</l> 
        <r>imir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>esos</l> 
        <r>imir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>imiere</l> 
        <r>imir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>imiere</l> 
        <r>imir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>imiereis</l> 
        <r>imir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>imieren</l> 
        <r>imir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>imieres</l> 
        <r>imir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>imiese</l> 
        <r>imir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>imiese</l> 
        <r>imir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>imieseis</l> 
        <r>imir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>imiesen</l> 
        <r>imir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>imieses</l> 
        <r>imir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>imiéremos</l> 
        <r>imir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>imiésemos</l> 
        <r>imir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ima</l> 
        <r>imir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ima</l> 
        <r>imir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ima</l> 
        <r>imir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>imamos</l> 
        <r>imir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>imamos</l> 
        <r>imir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>iman</l> 
        <r>imir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>iman</l> 
        <r>imir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>imas</l> 
        <r>imir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ime</l> 
        <r>imir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ime</l> 
        <r>imir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>imen</l> 
        <r>imir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>imes</l> 
        <r>imir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>imid</l> 
        <r>imir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>imid</l> 
        <r>imir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="S__cantad" /> 
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>imida</l> 
        <r>imir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>imidas</l> 
        <r>imir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>imido</l> 
        <r>imir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>imidos</l> 
        <r>imir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>imiendo</l> 
        <r>imir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>imiera</l> 
        <r>imir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>imiera</l> 
        <r>imir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>imierais</l> 
        <r>imir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>imieran</l> 
        <r>imir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>imieras</l> 
        <r>imir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>imieron</l> 
        <r>imir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>imimos</l> 
        <r>imir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>imimos</l> 
        <r>imir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>imir</l> 
        <r>imir<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>imir</l> 
        <r>imir<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="S__cantar" /> 
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>imiremos</l> 
        <r>imir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>imirá</l> 
        <r>imir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>imirán</l> 
        <r>imir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>imirás</l> 
        <r>imir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>imiré</l> 
        <r>imir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>imiréis</l> 
        <r>imir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>imiría</l> 
        <r>imir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>imiría</l> 
        <r>imir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>imiríais</l> 
        <r>imir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>imiríamos</l> 
        <r>imir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>imirían</l> 
        <r>imir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>imirías</l> 
        <r>imir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>imiste</l> 
        <r>imir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>imisteis</l> 
        <r>imir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>imiéndo</l> 
        <r>imir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r> 
      </p>
        <par n="S__cantándo" /> 
    </e>

          <e lm="comprimir"><i>compr</i><par n="compr/imir__vblex"/></e>
